Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
W

ATER WELL STANDARDS

12-5-120. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Water Well Standards Act of 1985."

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 974, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1.)

12-5-121. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide in this part for the application of standards for the siting, construction, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of wells and boreholes so as to protect the public health and the water resources of this state.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 974, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1.)

12-5-122. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Abandoned well" means a well or borehole, the use of which has been permanently discontinued, which is in such a state of disrepair that continued use for obtaining ground water or for other useful purposes is impracticable, or from which ground water for useful purposes is not obtainable.

"Aquifer" means a geologic formation, group of formations, or a part of a formation that is capable of yielding water to a well.

"Borehole" means a hole made into the earth's surface and extending at least 50 feet into the earth or at least ten feet below the water table, whichever is greater, with a drill, auger, or other tool for the purpose of: exploring subsurface strata in search of minerals, engineering or geologic data, water for water supply, blasting purposes, or monitoring.

"Capping" or "cap" means the temporary placing of a watertight seal on the upper terminal of a completed well so that no surface pollutants can enter the well.

"Casing" means an impervious durable pipe placed in a well to prevent the walls from caving and to seal off surface drainage or undesirable water, gas, or other fluids to prevent them from entering the well and includes specifically, but is not limited to, the following:

"Liner pipe" which shall mean a well casing installed without driving within a protective casing or open drillhole;

"Protective casing" which shall mean the permanent casing of the well; and

"Temporary casing" which shall mean a temporary casing placed in soft, sandy, or caving subsurface formations to prevent the hole from caving during drilling.

"Construction" means all acts necessary to construct a well or borehole for any intended purpose or use, including locating and drilling and the installation of pumps and pumping equipment.

"Contaminant" means any physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water, in excess of naturally occurring levels.

"Corehole" means a borehole made into the earth's surface and extending at least 50 feet into the earth or at least ten feet below the water table, whichever is greater, with a hollow drill to sample a cylindrical section of the earth's strata beneath the surface of the land or water.

"Council" means the State Water Well Standards Advisory Council.

"Dewatering well" means any well withdrawing 100,000 gallons of ground water or less on any one day in order to remove ground water from the vicinity of an excavation and which extends at least 50 feet into the earth or at least ten feet below the water table, whichever is greater.

"Director" means the Director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, State of Georgia, or his designee.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources, State of Georgia.

"Driller" means any person who engages in drilling or drilling operations and the installation of pumps and pumping equipment. Driller shall not include a person who only installs, services, and repairs pumps and pumping equipment.

"Drilling" or "drilling operation" means creating an excavation, well, borehole, or corehole by coring, boring, jetting, digging, driving, or otherwise constructing for any intended purpose or use, including locating, testing, or withdrawing ground water which is intended or usable as a source of water supply.

"Engineering borehole" means a borehole for which the primary purpose is to collect data for engineering design.

"Filled, sealed, and plugged" means the placing of impervious material when appropriate in the well or borehole to prevent pollutants from entering the subsurface strata or water-bearing formations from the surface, to conserve the aquifer yield or artesian head, or to eliminate physical hazards.

"Geologic borehole" means any borehole not regulated under the authority of Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of this title for which the primary purpose is to collect data for geologic, geophysical, or mineral resource evaluations.

(17.1) "Geothermal borehole" means any hole in the earth which is drilled for the purpose of installing piping for heating and air conditioning systems through which water, antifreeze, water mixtures, freon, or other media are circulated to exchange heat with the earth for the purpose of heating or cooling, or both.

"Ground water" means water of underground streams, channels, artesian basins, reservoirs, lakes, and other water under the surface of the earth, whether public or private, natural or artificial, which is contained within, flows through, or borders upon this state or any portion thereof, including those portions of the Atlantic Ocean over which the state has jurisdiction.

"Individual water well" means any well constructed for the purpose of obtaining ground water to supply water appurtenant to a single-family dwelling and intended for domestic use, including, but not limited to, household purposes, farm livestock, or gardens.

"Industrial well" means any well constructed for the purpose of withdrawing 100,000 gallons of ground water or less on any one day for processing or cooling water or for purposes other than drinking water.

"Irrigation well" means any well constructed for the purpose of obtaining ground water to supply irrigation water for agriculture, silviculture, golf courses, fish farms, and land beautification, but excluding single-family irrigation of lawns or gardens.

"Monitoring well" means any well for which the primary purpose is to collect data for hydrologic, geohydrologic, or ground water quality or quantity evaluations.

"Nonpublic water well" means any well constructed as a source of water supply for a water system which provides piped water to the public for human consumption, if such system has less than 15 service connections or regularly serves less than 25 individuals, excluding individual water wells.

"Person" means any individual, partnership, association, trust, firm, corporation, county, municipality, or other entity, including the state and the federal government.

"Pollutant" means dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue, sewage, garbage, sewage sludge, munitions, chemical wastes, biological materials, radioactive materials, heat, wrecked or discarded equipment, rock, sand, cellar dirt, industrial wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural wastes, or any other wastes or substances that do not naturally occur in the aquifer.

"Professional engineer" means a person registered to practice professional engineering in the State of Georgia in accordance with Chapter 15 of Title 43.

"Professional geologist" means a person registered to practice as a geologist in the State of Georgia in accordance with Chapter 19 of Title 43.

(27.1) "Pump contractor" means any person who engages in the business of installing, servicing, or repairing pumps and pumping equipment for water wells but who is not a driller or water well contractor.

"Seismic shot hole" means any borehole in which explosives are detonated for the purpose of seismic investigations.

"Under the direction of a professional geologist or professional engineer" means that a professional geologist or professional engineer has reviewed well or borehole drilling, construction, and abandonment plans or criteria and has provided instructions to the driller as to how the well or borehole is to be drilled, constructed, or abandoned.

"Water table" means, exclusive of perched conditions, the shallowest permanent occurrence of ground water.

"Water well" means any excavation which is cored, bored, drilled, jetted, dug, or otherwise constructed for the purpose of locating, testing, or withdrawing ground water and which is intended or usable as a source of water supply for individual homes, farms, irrigation, industrial processes, public water systems, or nonpublic water systems.

"Water well contractor" means any person engaging in the business of constructing water wells and installing pumps and pumping equipment. Water well contractor shall not include a person who only installs, services, and repairs pumps and pumping equipment.

"Well" means any excavation in which the vertical dimension exceeds the horizontal dimension that is bored, cored, drilled, dug, jetted, or otherwise constructed for the purpose of locating, testing, or withdrawing ground water; or for evaluating, testing, developing, draining, or recharging ground water reservoirs or aquifers; or for the exploration, evaluating, testing, or developing of minerals; or which causes the movement of water from or into any aquifer or subsurface strata; and shall include engineering and geologic boreholes.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 607, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 254, § 1/HB 1206.)

12-5-123. Creation of council; membership; chairperson; meetings; majority vote; quorum; director as secretary; self-governance; reimbursement for expenses; Attorney General to provide legal services.

The State Water Well Standards Advisory Council is created. The council shall be composed of the following:

A member appointed by the Governor from the public at large, who shall not be in any way connected with the well drilling industry. The member representing the public on July 1, 2001, shall continue to serve in this position from July 1, 2001, to June 30, 2002;

A member appointed by the commissioner of natural resources. The member appointed by the commissioner of natural resources serving on July 1, 2001, shall continue to serve in this position until June 30, 2002;

A member appointed by the Governor representing the farming industry. The member representing the farming industry on July 1, 2001, shall continue to serve in this position until June 30, 2003;

Four members representing the water well drilling industry appointed by the Governor who shall be licensed and practicing drillers. The members who are water well drillers serving on July 1, 2001, shall continue to serve in these positions until June 30, 2002, at which time the Governor shall appoint two members to terms ending June 30, 2003; one member to a term ending June 30, 2004; and one member to a term of office ending June 30, 2005. The members serving on such date shall be eligible for reappointment; and

A member appointed by the Governor who is a registered professional geologist or registered professional engineer. The member who is a registered professional geologist or registered professional engineer serving on July 1, 2001, shall continue to serve in such position until June 30, 2004.

The successor to each member appointed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for a term of three years, and the Governor shall fill any vacancy in the council, except for the member appointed by the commissioner of natural resources, with each successor appointed in the same manner as his predecessor.

At the first meeting of the council held in each calendar year, the council shall elect a chairperson who shall serve for one year, adopt rules of procedure, and develop a work plan. The chairperson may be reelected in subsequent years by the council. A vacancy in the position of chairperson shall be filled by vote of the council.

The council shall meet at such times and at such designated places as it may determine but shall hold at least three regular meetings each year. An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present shall be necessary to transact business. Four members shall constitute a quorum.

The director or his designee shall be the secretary of the council and, in addition to his duties as prescribed by law, shall perform such other administrative duties as may be prescribed by the council. Except as provided in this part, the council shall provide by rule and regulation for its own government. Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall receive the same expense allowance as that received by members of the General Assembly and the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal car as that received by all other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation cost if traveling by public carrier within the state. Any councilmember shall also be reimbursed for any conference or meeting registration fee incurred in the performance of his duties as a councilmember. For each day's service outside of the state as a councilmember, such member shall receive actual expenses as an expense allowance as well as the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal car as that received by other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation cost if traveling by public carrier or by rental motor vehicle. Expense vouchers submitted by members of the council are subject to approval of the director or his designee.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the council.

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 974, § 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 52, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1373, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Provisions pertaining to professional licensing boards generally, T. 43, C. 1.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in
subsection (e), "councilmember" was substituted for "council member" in three places.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Water Well Standards Advisory Council, Chapter 770-1 et seq.

12-5-124. Powers and duties of council generally.

In carrying out this part, the council shall have the following powers and duties:

To adopt and amend rules and regulations which may be reasonably necessary to govern the licensing of water well contractors and the regulation of proceedings before the council and to carry out such other powers and duties assigned to the council under this part. The council and all of its rules, regulations, and procedures are subject to and shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act";

To pay into the state treasury all fees and moneys received by it;

To adopt and have an official seal;

To set the amount of all fees required by this part;

To license water well contractors and certify pump contractors;

To review the effect and practicality of standards set up in this part and recommend to the General Assembly adjustments and changes to achieve the purposes of this part;

To review and recommend to the General Assembly any legislation which would improve the quality of relations between the water well drilling industry and the public; and

To conduct hearings and institute and prosecute court actions as may be necessary to enforce compliance with any provisions of this part and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part that relate to water wells.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1520, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 607, § 3.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Organization, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Water Well Standards Advisory Council, Chapter 770-1 et seq.

12-5-125. License requirement; drilling under direction of professional geologist or engineer.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-127, no person shall drill a water well or geothermal borehole without first having a water well contractor's license issued by the council. No person, including licensed water well contractors, shall drill any kind of well, borehole, or corehole, other than a water well or geothermal borehole, unless such person is acting under the direction of a professional geologist or a professional engineer.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-125

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 254, § 2/HB 1206.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192,

§

1 repealed former Code Section

12-5-125

and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section pertained to the council's duty to study the need for standards and rules and regulations as to water wells and to make recommendations to the General Assembly and was based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 974,

§

5, and Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506,

§

3. For present provisions regarding such standards and rules and regulations, see

§§

12-5-124

(paragraphs (5) and (6)) and

12-5-134

.

12-5-126. Director as administrative agent; administrative duties of division; orders, notices, and processes.

The director or his designee shall act as the administrative agent for the council.

The division shall have the duty to bring together and keep all records of the council; to receive all applications for licenses; to schedule a time and place for examinations, with the consent of the council; to schedule a time and place for all hearings; to issue certificates upon authority of the council; and to collect all fees and to remit them to the state treasury.

All orders and processes of the council shall be signed and attested by the director or his designee, and any notice or legal process necessary to be served upon the council may be served upon the director.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Cross references.

- General duties of division director, authority of division director as to determination of expiration, renewal, and penalty dates of licenses,

§§

43-1-3

,

43-1-4

.

12-5-127. Licensing of water well contractors generally; applications for trainee licenses; violation of Code section.

Any person desiring to engage in the business of water well construction in this state shall apply to the council for a license as a water well contractor. All such applications shall be made on forms provided by the division and shall be accompanied by a fee to be prescribed by the council but not exceeding $400.00 per license period.

An applicant for a license as a water well contractor shall be required to have two years' experience working in the water well construction business under a licensed water well contractor and shall be required to pass an examination administered by the council. The examination may be written, oral, or practical work, or any combination of the three. The examination shall relate to the applicant's knowledge of basic ground water, basic well construction, and the general contents of this part.

Satisfactory proof of two years' experience in the water well construction business shall be made by presenting certified affidavits from one or more licensed water well contractors that the applicant has had at least two years of full-time water well construction experience. If the required experience was obtained under two or more licensed water well contractors, then a certified affidavit specifying exact dates of such experience shall be required from each licensed contractor. In lieu of the method described above, an applicant may present other proof satisfactory to the council of two years' experience constructing water wells. The council may require the applicant and the water well contractors who swear to such affidavits to appear before the council to discuss the applicant's qualifications.

Any person wishing to engage in the water well construction business shall designate himself or herself or at least one partner, officer, or full-time employee to fulfill the above requirements. If the requirements are satisfactorily fulfilled, the person shall be granted a license under this part, and such license shall cover water well construction activities for which the person is responsible and so licensed. The partners, officers, and employees of the person shall be allowed to engage in the activities covered by the license if the individual who fulfilled the licensing requirements has performed or approved such activities and such approval is posted at the site of the activity on forms to be provided by the council for that purpose. Any such license shall be valid so long as the designated partner, officer, or full-time employee is associated with the licensee or until it otherwise expires.

The provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection notwithstanding, the water well construction activities of the partners, officers, and employees of the individual who fulfilled the licensing requirements shall continue to be authorized under a license which was valid at the time of the licensee's death for a period of 180 days following the date of such death.

The council, upon application, may issue an appropriate license to any person who holds a similar license in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, if the requirements for the license do not conflict with this part and are of a standard not less than that specified by this part and by rules and regulations promulgated under this part; provided, however, that such other state, territory, or possession grants similar reciprocity to license holders in this state.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require the registration of a person who constructs a well on his or her own or leased property intended for use only in a single-family house which is his or her permanent residence or intended for use only for farming purposes on his or her farm, which well produces less than 25,000 gallons per day, so long as the waters to be produced are not intended for use by the public or in any residence other than his or her own.

The State of Georgia preempts the field of licensing water well contractors. Licenses issued by the council shall authorize bona fide holders thereof to engage in the business authorized by such licenses anywhere within the territorial limits of the state. No provision of this part shall be construed as prohibiting or preventing a municipality or county from fixing, charging, assessing, or collecting any business license fee, registration fee, tax, or gross receipt tax on any profession covered by this part or upon any related profession or anyone engaged in any related profession governed by this part.

The council shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of licenses under this Code section to complete continuing education of not more than four hours annually. The council may provide courses and shall approve such courses offered by the division, institutions of higher learning, technical colleges, and trade, technical, or professional organizations; provided, however, that continuing education courses or programs related to water well construction or standards provided or conducted by public utilities, equipment manufacturers, or institutions under the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia shall constitute acceptable continuing professional education programs for the purposes of this subsection. Continuing education courses or programs shall be in the areas of safety, environmental protection, ground-water geology, technological advances, business management, or government regulation. Continuing education courses shall be designed for water well contractors having variable educational backgrounds. Courses or programs conducted by manufacturers specifically to promote their products shall not be approved.

All provisions of this subsection relating to continuing professional education shall be administered by the council.

The council shall be authorized to waive the continuing education requirements in cases of hardship, disability, or illness or under such other circumstances as the council deems appropriate.

No license shall be granted unless the council specifically authorizes the granting of such license. Staff members of the council may not issue licenses without the specific authorization of the council.

Any person who violates the provisions of this Code section with regard to licensing shall not be eligible to apply for or receive a license under this Code section for a period of two years after being convicted of such violation.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1373, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 301, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 607, § 4; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, "two years'" was substituted for "two year's" in the first sentence of subsection (b).

12-5-128. Contents of license; display.

The licenses granted under Code Section 12-5-127 shall contain the name of the contractor, date of issuance, expiration date, license number, and the official designation or symbol of the council, together with the signatures of the council chairman and the chief administrative officer of the council. This license shall be displayed in a conspicuous place at the operator's principal place of business.

All rigs and commercial vehicles used by water well contractors in well construction operations shall prominently display on each rig or vehicle the name of the contractor and shall likewise display the appropriate water well contractor's license number.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1.)

12-5-129. Suspension and revocation of licenses; hearings; reissuance of revoked licenses; injunction; cessation of well operation; seizure of equipment.

The council may suspend or revoke a license upon a finding of one or more of the following grounds:

Material misstatement in the application for license;

Willful disregard or violation of Code Section 12-5-133 or any law of the State of Georgia relating to wells, including any violation of standards or rules adopted pursuant to this part;

Willfully aiding or abetting another in the violation of Code Section 12-5-133 or any law of the State of Georgia relating to wells;

Incompetency in the performance of the work of a water well contractor;

Making substantial misrepresentations or false promises in connection with the occupation of a water well contractor;

Failure to provide and maintain on file at all times with the director a performance bond or irrevocable letter of credit as required by Code Section 12-5-135; and

Allowing an unlicensed driller to use or to work under such licensee's license in any way. However, this paragraph shall not apply to any employee of a licensed driller who receives only a salary or hourly wage or a bona fide business partner.

The council shall have power and authority to hear and determine all complaints of violations of this part and the regulations pursuant thereto, filed with the council by any interested party, after first giving the person against whom the complaint is filed at least ten days' written notice of the time and place of hearing, together with a copy of the complaint filed against such person. Hearings will be conducted according to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act." If, upon the hearing, the council deems such complaint meritorious, the council may, in its discretion, suspend or revoke the license of the person against whom the complaint is filed or may allow the person a reasonable time in which to meet and correct the complaint of the objecting party. Suspensions or revocations of licenses shall be conducted according to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

The council, by majority vote of the quorum, may reissue a license to any person whose license has been revoked upon written application to the council by the applicant, showing good cause to justify the reissuance.

Whenever it shall appear to the council that any person is or has been violating any provisions of this part or any of the lawful rules, regulations, or orders of the council, the council or the appropriate district attorney may file a petition for injunction in the appropriate superior court of this state against such person, for the purpose of enjoining any such violation. It shall not be necessary to allege or prove that there is no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to any other legal remedy which the council has and shall be in addition to any right of criminal prosecution provided by law.

The director shall be authorized to order the cessation of operation of any well operated in violation of this part and the seizure of all drilling equipment used in such drilling operation; provided, however, that the operator of any such drilling operation shall be afforded a hearing before the administrative law judge of the Department of Natural Resources on such order of the director within 48 hours.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 963, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 607, § 5.)

12-5-130. Expiration and renewal of licenses; replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated licenses.

All licenses expire biennially. All applications for renewal shall be filed with the division prior to the expiration date, accompanied by a renewal fee not exceeding $400.00 per renewal period as prescribed by the division. A license which has expired for failure to renew may be restored only after application and payment of the prescribed restoration fee. A new license to replace any license lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued, subject to the rules of the council and payment of a fee set by the council.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 607, § 6.)

12-5-131. Notifying contractors of changes in rules and regulations.

The council may from time to time amend its rules and regulations governing water well contractors. The council will notify each water well contractor on the official list of licensed water well contractors of any changes in the rules and regulations prior to the effective date of the changes. This notification or lack thereof will in no way affect the effective date of the changes in the rules and regulations.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1.)

12-5-131.1. Licensing requirements for drilling well on own property; water well contractors completing electrical or plumbing work incidental to drilling and construction of well.

Nothing in this part shall prohibit a person from drilling a well on his or her own property if such property is his or her primary residence. A person is prohibited from drilling a well or wells on property he or she owns and is developing for resale unless such person has a license as a water well contractor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a person licensed as a water well contractor pursuant to Code Section

12-5-127

is not required to be licensed under Chapter 14 of Title 43, when in the course of constructing a water well, he or she makes certain electrical or plumbing connections or performs other electrical or plumbing work incidental to the drilling and construction of the well; provided, however, that any such electrical and plumbing work meets or exceeds all applicable local, state, or federal codes, whichever is most stringent.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-131.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 7.)

12-5-132. Effect of part.

Nothing in this part shall affect oil and gas drilling operations covered by Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter 4 of this title.

Nothing in this part shall affect the regulation of ground-water use by the division pursuant to Part 2 of this article.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "ground-water" was substituted for "ground water" in subsection (b).

12-5-133. Penalty; evidence of violation of part.

Any person who engages in or follows the business or occupation of, or advertises, holds himself or herself out, or acts, temporarily or otherwise, as a water well contractor without having first secured the required license or renewal thereof or any person who otherwise violates any provisions of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $100.00 and not more than $1,000.00. Each day during which such violation exists or continues shall constitute a separate offense.

In order to prove a violation of this part, it shall not be necessary for a state or local enforcement official to actually observe a well being drilled by a person who does not possess a valid license as required by this part. Other evidence of a violation of this part, including, but not limited to, bills, invoices, photographs, proposals, or any form of advertising, may be sufficient for a conviction.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1506, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1192, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 8; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-10/HB 233.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2015, p. 693,

§

4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

12-5-133.1. Civil penalties; hearing.

In addition to the provisions of Code Section 12-5-133, any person violating any provision of this part or the rules or regulations effective under this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.00 per day. Each day during which the violation or failure or refusal to comply continues shall be a separate violation.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this part or any rule or regulation effective under this part, he or she may upon written request cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed by the board. Upon finding that such person has violated any provision of this part or any rule or regulation effective under this part, the hearing officer shall issue his or her decision imposing civil penalties as provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

In rendering a decision under this Code section imposing civil penalties, the hearing officer shall consider all factors which are relevant, including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of civil penalty necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying to comply;

The character and degree of impact of the violation or failure on the natural resources of the state, especially any rare or unique natural phenomena;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in promptly taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to comply with this part or to correct the violation or failure;

Any prior violations of or failures by such person to comply with statutes, rules, regulations, or orders administered, adopted, or issued by the director or the council;

The character and degree of injury to or interference with public health or safety which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure; and

The character and degree of injury to or interference with reasonable use of property which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation or failure.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-133.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 315, § 9.)